Hawaii statutes.
§431:10-226 Renewal of policy; new policy
not required. At the option of the insurer, any insurance policy
terminating at a specified expiration date and not otherwise renewable, may be
renewed or extended, upon a currently authorized policy form and at the premium
rate then required for a specific additional period or periods by a certificate
or by endorsement of the policy. The issuance of a new policy is not required.
[L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next